Utah statutes.
59-12-803.   Distribution of revenues generated by rural county health care facilities tax.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection 59-12-802(5) and Subsection (2), all revenues collected by a county under Section 59-12-802 shall be distributed quarterly by the county legislative body to rural county health care facilities.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), if there is more than one rural county health care facility in a county, the revenues collected by a county under Section 59-12-802 shall be distributed as determined by the county legislative body.



Amended by Chapter 253, 2000 General Session

